scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     adaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadaamaa
     adaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadaamaa
     adaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidadaamaa
     adaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadaamaan
     adaam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adaamaad
     adaam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edaamaad
     adaam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: adaam
     adaawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadaawamaa
     adaawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadaawamaa
     adaawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidadaawamaa
     adaawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindadaawamig
     adaawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadaawamaan
     adaawam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adaawamaad
     adaawam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edaawamaad
     adaawam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adaawam
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadimaa
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadimaa
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidadimaa
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindadimig
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidadimin
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidadim
     adim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadimaan
     adim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adimaad
     adim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edimaad
     adim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adim
     agadenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagadenimaa
     agadenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindagadenimig
     agadenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidagadenimin
     agadenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidagadenim
     agadenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagadenimaan
     agadenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agadenimaad
     agadenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egadenimaad
     agaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagaji'aa
     agaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaji'aa
     agaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagaji'aa
     agaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaji'aan
     agaji'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaji'aad
     agaji'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaji'aad
     agaji'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaji'
     agazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagazomaa
     agazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindagazomig
     agazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidagazom
     agazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidagazomin
     agazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagazomaan
     agazom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agazomaad
     agazom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egazomaad
     agaasade'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagaasade'aa
     agaasade'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasade'aa
     agaasade'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagaasade'aa
     agaasade'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasade'aan
     agaasade'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasade'aad
     agaasade'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasade'aad
     agaasade'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+0: agaasade'
     agaasenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagaasenimaa
     agaasenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasenimaa
     agaasenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagaasenimaa
     agaasenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasenimaan
     agaasenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasenimaad
     agaasenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasenimaad
     agaasenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasenim
     agaasi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagaasi'aa
     agaasi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaasi'aa
     agaasi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagaasi'aa
     agaasi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaasi'aan
     agaasi'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaasi'aad
     agaasi'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaasi'aad
     agaasi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaasi'
     agaashiinyi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaashiinyi'aa
     agaashiinyi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaashiinyi'aan
     agaashiinyi'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaashiinyi'aad
     agaashiinyi'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaashiinyi'aad
     agaashiinyi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaashiinyi'
     agim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagimaa
     agim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagimaa
     agim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagimaa
     agim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+?: nindagimaag
     agim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagimaan
     agim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agimaad
     agim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egimaad
     agim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agim 
     agogwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagogwaanaa
     agogwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagogwaanaa
     agogwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagogwaanaa
     agogwaazh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagogwaanaan
     agogwaazh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agogwaanaad
     agogwaazh+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egogwaanaad
     agogwaazh+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agogwaazh
     agon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagonaa
     agon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagonaa
     agon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagonaa
     agon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagonaan
     agon+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agonaad
     agon+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egonaad
     agon+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+3: agon 
     agonjim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagonjimaa
     agonjim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagonjimaa
     agonjim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagonjimaa
     agonjim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagonjimaan
     agonjim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agonjimaad
     agonjim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egonjimaad
     agonjim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agonjim 
     agwanem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwanemaa
     agwanem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwanemaa
     agwanem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwanemaa
     agwanem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwanemaan
     agwanem+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwanemaad
     agwanem+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwanemaad
     agwanem+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwanem
     agwanjim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwanjimaa
     agwanjim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwanjimaan
     agwanjim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwanjimaad
     agwanjim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwanjimaad
     agwanjim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwanjim
     agwazhe'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwazhe'aa
     agwazhe'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwazhe'aa
     agwazhe'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwazhe'aa
     agwazhe'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwazhe'aan
     agwazhe'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwazhe'aad
     agwazhe'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwazhe'aad
     agwazhe'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwazhe' 
     agwaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaabiiginaa
     agwaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabiiginaa
     agwaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaabiiginaa
     agwaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabiiginaan
     agwaabiigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabiiginaad
     agwaabiigin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabiiginaad
     agwaabiigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaabiigin
     agwaashim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaashimaa
     agwaashim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaashimaan
     agwaashim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaashimaad
     agwaashim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaashimaad
     agwaashim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaashim 
     agwaawebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaawebinaa
     agwaawebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaawebinaa
     agwaawebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaawebinaa
     agwaawebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaawebinaan
     agwaawebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaawebinaad
     agwaawebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaawebinaad
     agwaawebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaawebin 
     agwaayoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaayoomaa
     agwaayoom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaayoomaan
     agwaayoom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaayoomaad
     agwaayoom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaayoomaad
     agwaayoom+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaayoom
     ajidakiiwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indajidakiiwebinaa
     ajidakiiwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajidakiiwebinaan
     ajidakiiwebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+?: ajidakiiwebinaad
     ajidakiiwebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejidakiiwebinaad
     ajidakiiwebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ajidakiiwebin
     ajidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indajidinaa
     ajidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindajidinaa
     ajidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidajidinaa
     ajidin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajidinaan
     ajidin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ajidinaad
     ajidin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejidinaad
     ajidin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ajidin 
     ajijishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indajijishimaa
     ajijishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajijishimaan
     ajijishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ajijishimaad
     ajijishim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejijishimaad
     ajijishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ajijishim
     ajijiwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindajijiwebinaa
     ajijiwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajijiwebinaan
     ajijiwebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ajijiwebinaad
     ajijiwebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejijiwebinaad
     ajijiwebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ajijiwebin
     akawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakawaabamaa
     akawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakawaabamaa
     akawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidakawaabamaa
     akawaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakawaabamaan
     akawaabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akawaabamaad
     akawaabam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekawaabamaad
     akawaabam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akawaabam 
     akawaa'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akawaa'
     akawaa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakawaa'aa
     akawaa'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakawaa'aan
     akawaa'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akawaa'aad
     akawaa'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekawaa'aad
     akoo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakoo'aa
     akoo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakoo'aa
     akoo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidakoo'aa
     akoo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakoo'aan
     akoo'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akoo'aad
     akoo'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekoo'aad
     akoo'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akoo' 
     akwaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakwaabamaa
     akwaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaabamaan
     akwaabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaabamaad
     akwaabam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaabamaad
     akwaabam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaabam
     amadin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indamadinaa
     amadin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamadinaa
     amadin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidamadinaa
     amadin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamadinaan
     amadin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amadinaad
     amadin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emadinaad
     amadin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amadin
     amaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamaji'aa
     amaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamaji'aan
     amaji'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amaji'aad
     amaji'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emaji'aad
     amaji'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3Sg: amaji'
     amajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indamajimaa
     amajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamajimaa
     amajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidamajimaa
     amajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamajimaan
     amajim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amajimaad
     amajim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emajimaad
     amajim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: amajim
     amajiwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamajiwebinaa
     amajiwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamajiwebinaan
     amajiwebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amajiwebinaad
     amajiwebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emajiwebinaad
     amajiwebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amajiwebin
     amajwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indamajwebinaa
     amajwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamajwebinaa
     amajwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidamajwebinaa
     amajwebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamajwebinaan
     amajwebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amajwebinaad
     amajwebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emajwebinaad
     amajwebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amajwebin 
     anaamenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanaamenimaa
     anaamenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanaamenimaa
     anaamenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanaamenimaa
     anaamenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanaamenimaan
     anaamenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anaamenimaad
     anaamenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enaamenimaad
     anaamenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anaamenim
     anaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanaamimaa
     anaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanaamimaa
     anaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanaamimaa
     anaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanaamimaan
